en: Rose hip soups, Rosehip soups
da: Hybensupper
de: Schwedische Hagebuttensuppen
eo: Rozbera supoj
es: Sopa de escaramujo
ja: ローズヒップスープ
jv: Sop rose hip
ko: 뉘폰소파, 로즈힙 수프
nb: Nypesupper
nl: Rozenbottelsoep
nn: Nypesupper
ru: Суп из шиповника
sv: Nyponsoppor
uk: Шипшиновий суп
uz: Naʼmatakli shoʻrva
zh: 玫瑰果汤

en: Juices and nectars, fruit-juices-and-nectars
bg: Сок и нектар
ca: Sucs i nèctars
cs: Džusy a nektary
da: Juice og nektar
de: Säfte und Nektare, Saft und Nektar
es: Zumos y néctares
fi: mehut ja nektarit
fr: Jus et nectars
he: מיצים ונקטרים
hr: sokovi i nektari
hu: Levek és nektárok, Dzsúszok és nektárok
it: Succo e nettare
lt: Sultys ir nektarai
nl: Sappen en Nectars
pl: Soki i nektary
pt: Sucos e néctares
ro: Sucuri și nectaruri, Sucuri si nectaruri
ru: Соки и нектары
zh: 果汁及果浆饮料

en: Fruit and vegetable juices
bg: Сокове от плодове и зеленчуци
es: Zumos de fruta y verdura
fi: Hedelmä- ja vihannesmehut
fr: Jus de fruits et légumes
hr: Sokovi od voća i povrća
hu: Gyümölcslevek és zöldséglevek, Gyümölcslé és zöldésglé
it: Succhi di frutta e di verdura
lt: Vaisių ir daržovių sultys
nl: Fruit- en groentesappen
pl: Soki owocowe i warzywne

en: Fruit-based beverages
bg: Плодови напитки, Напитки с плодове
ca: Begudes amb base de fruites
da: Frugtbaserede drikkevarer
de: Fruchtgetränke
es: Bebidas a base de frutas
fi: hedelmäpohjaiset juomat
fr: Boissons aux fruits
he: משקאות מבוססי פירות
hr: Pića na bazi voća
hu: Gyümölcsalapú italok, Gyümölcsitalok
it: Bevande a base di frutta
lt: Vaisiniai gėrimai
nl: Vruchtendranken
pl: Napoje owocowe, Napoje na bazie owoców
pt: Bebidas à base de frutas
ru: Напитки на основе фруктов
sv: Fruktbaserade drycker
tr: Meyveli içecekler
zh: 果汁饮料, 水果饮料

en: Aloe Vera drinks
bg: Напитки с алое вера
de: Aloe Vera Saften
es: Bebidas de aloe vera, Bebidas de áloe vera, Bebidas de áloe
fr: Boissons à l'aloe-vera
hr: Napitci od aloe vere
hu: Aloe Vera italok
it: Bevande all'Aloe Vera
lt: Aloe Vera gėrimai
nl: Aloe Vera sappen
pl: Napoje z aloesem, Napoje aloesowe
zh: 芦荟饮料

en: Ginger juices
hu: Gyömbérlevek, Gyömbérlé
nl: Gembersappen

en: Beverages with orange
bg: Напитки с портокал
de: Getränke mit Orange
es: Bebidas con naranja
fi: appelsiinijuomat
fr: Boissons à l'orange
hr: Pića s narančom
hu: Narancsos italok, Narancsalapú italok
it: Aranciata, Bevande all'arancia
lt: Apelsinų skonio gėrimai
nl: Sinaasappeldranken, Dranken met sinaasappel
pl: Napoje pomarańczowe
pt: Bebidas com laranja

en: Beverages with cranberry
bg: Напитки с червена боровинка
de: Cranberry Getränke
es: Bebidas con arándanos
fr: Boissons à la canneberge
hr: Napitci s brusnicom
hu: Vörösáfonyás italok
it: Bevande all'ossicocco, Bevande al cranberry
lt: Spanguolių skonio gėrimai
nl: Dranken met veenbessensmaak, Veenbessendranken
pl: Napoje żurawinowe

en: Fruit and milk beverages, Fruit and milk juices, milk and fruit juices, Fruit juices with milk
de: Frucht- und Milchsäfte, Milch und Fruchtsäfte
es: Bebidas de fruta y leche
fi: Mehu-maitojuomat
fr: Boissons au fruit et au lait, Boissons au lait et au jus de fruits, jus de fruits au lait, jus de fruits lactés, Boissons au jus de fruit et au lait
hr: Voćni i mliječni napici
hu: Gyümölcs- és tejitalok, Tejes gyümölcslevek
lt: Vaisiniai ir pieniniai gėrimai, Vaisių ir pieno sultys, Pieniniai ir vaisiniai gėrimai, Vaisių sultys su pienu
nl: Fruit- en melksappen

en: Fruit and plant-milk beverages
fr: Boissons aux fruits et au lait végetal
hr: Voćni i biljno-mliječni napici
hu: Gyümölcs- és növényi italok
nl: Plantaardige fruitdranken

en: Fruit and oat beverages
fr: Boissons aux fruits et à l'avoine
hu: Gyümölcs- és zabitalok

en: Fruit and soy beverages, Fruit juice and soy drinks, Soy drinks with concentrated fruit juice
de: Furchtsäfte und Sojagetränke
es: Bebidas a base de zumo de frutas y soja, Bebidas de zumo de frutas y soja
fi: soijamehujuomat
fr: Boissons aux fruits et au soja, Boissons à base de jus de fruits et de soja, Boissons au soja et jus de fruits concentrés
hr: Voćni i sojini napici
hu: Gyümölcs- és szójaitalok
lt: Vaisių ir sojos gėrimai, sojų gėrimai su koncentruotomis vaisių sultimis
nl: Vruchten- en sojadranken, Vruchten- en sojadrank

en: Smoothies
bg: Смути
da: Smoothies
de: Smoothies
es: Smoothies
fi: smoothiet
fr: Smoothies
hr: Smoothieji
hu: Smoothie-k, Smoothie
it: Frappè, Milkshake, Smoothie
ja: スムージー
lt: Glotnučiai
nl: Smoothies
pl: Smoothie

en: Fruit smoothies
bg: Плодово смути
de: Fruchtsmoothies
es: Smoothies de fruta, Batidos de fruta
fi: hedelmäsmoothiet
fr: Smoothies aux fruits
hr: Voćni smoothie
hu: Gyümölcsturmixok, Gyümölcsös smoothie
it: Frappè alla frutta, Milkshake alla frutta, Smoothie alla frutta
lt: Vaisių glotnutis, vaisinis glotnutis
nl: Fruitsmoothies
pl: Smoothie owocowe, Owocowe smoothie

en: Kiwifruit apple and pineapple smoothies
fr: Smoothie kiwi pomme ananas
nl: Smoothie kiwi appel ananas

en: Fruit and vegetable shots
da: Frugt- og grøntsagsshots
sv: Frukt- och grönsaksshots

en: Ginger shots, Ginger shot
da: Ingefærshots
de: Ingwershot
sv: Ingefärsshots

en: Turmeric shots
da: Gurkemejeshots
sv: Gurkmejashots

en: Ginger and turmeric shots, Turmeric and ginger shots
da: Ingefær- og gurkemejeshots, Gurkemeje- og ingefærshots
sv: Ingefärs- och gurkmejashots, Gurkmeja- och ingefärsshots

en: Ginger shots with apple and lemon
da: Ingefærshots med æble og citron
sv: Ingefärsshots med äpple och citron